New Jersey, session 222, A2797.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No grantor conveying title to real property shall enter into a contract for the sale of real property requiring the grantee of that title to pay the fees imposed upon the grantor pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-7) and section 2 of P.L.2003, c.113 (C.46:15-7.1). b.    A grantee may bring private legal action against the grantor conveying title to real property to the grantee if the grantor violates the provisions of this section. c.     The court shall order that a grantor conveying title to real property who violates the provisions of this section pay to the grantee: (1)   a refund of all monies received from the grantee for the payment of the realty transfer fee plus $1,000.00;  and (2)   the grantees reasonable attorney's fees, filing fees, and other reasonable expenses incurred in securing a judgment against the grantor. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment.